Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.060

Road signs in range areas.

At the point where a public road enters a range area, and at such other points thereon within such area as the county legislative authority shall designate, there shall be erected a road sign bearing the words: "RANGE AREA. WATCH OUT FOR LIVESTOCK."

[ 1989 c 286 s 8; 1937 c 40 s 5; RRS s 3070-2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.